Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1990
Required officers.

(a) Unless otherwise provided in the articles or bylaws, a corporation shall have a president, a secretary, a treasurer, and such other officers as are appointed by the board.

(b) The bylaws or the board shall delegate to one of the officers responsibility for preparing minutes of the directors' and members' meetings and for authenticating records of the corporation.

(c) The same individual may simultaneously hold more than one office in a corporation.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 90.